Hawaii statutes.
[§571-95] Sole factor; effect on existing
orders. (a) Deployment or the potential for future deployment shall not
be the sole factor in awarding custody and must be considered in relation to
all of the factors in section 571-46.

(b) If deployment or the potential for future
deployment results in the modification of the custody or visitation terms
established by a prior order, the court order shall include, without
limitation, the following conditions:

(1) A specific transition schedule to facilitate return
to the prior order over the shortest reasonable time period after the
deployment ends, taking into consideration the best interest of the child;

(2) A specific date at which time the prior order
will return to full force and effect; and

(3) If the deployment is extended or shortened, then:

(A) The deployed parent has a duty to inform
the other parent of the change as soon as the information is available;

(B) The other parent has the responsibility
to return to court to change the effective date of the modification of the prior
order made pursuant to this subsection; and

(C) The transition schedule shall take effect
at the end of the modified deployment.

(c) Upon request of either parent the court
may set a review hearing to occur within thirty days of the deployed parent's
return from deployment at which time the court may make such orders as are in
the best interest of the child. [L 2010, c 177, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next